Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Article 1. Taxation.
§ 21-33-61.
Redemption of land sold.

The owner, or any person for him with his consent, or any person interested in the land sold for taxes, shall have two years from the date of sale in which to redeem such real property from such sale, redemption to be made by paying the taxes, damages and costs, as provided by law for the redemption of land from tax sales, saving, however, to infants and persons of unsound mind, whose real property may be sold for taxes, the right to redeem the same within two years after attaining full age or being restored to sanity, from the municipality or any purchaser thereof, on the basis herein prescribed, and on their paying the value of any permanent improvements on the land made after the expiration of two years from the date of sale of the real property for taxes. Upon such payment to the clerk of the municipality, he shall execute to the person redeeming the real property a release of all claim or title of the municipality or purchaser to such real property, which said release shall be attested by the seal of the municipality, and shall be entitled to be recorded without acknowledgment, as deeds are recorded. Said release when so executed and attested shall operate as a quitclaim on the part of the municipality or purchaser of any right or title under said tax sale.

The term “taxes” as used in Sections 21-33-55 through 21-33-61 shall include special improvement assessments or any installment thereof that may be delinquent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3742-29; Laws, 1938, Ex. Sess., ch. 70; Laws, 1950, ch. 492, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-63.
Sale for taxes; sale list.

Sales for the nonpayment of municipal taxes, both ad valorem and for special improvements, shall be made by the tax collector at such place, within the corporate limits, as the governing authorities may direct. The sale of real estate for ad valorem taxes and special improvement assessments and sale of personal property shall be made upon the same notice, at the same time, and in the same manner as provided by law for sales of like property for unpaid state and county taxes.

The lists of lands sold for taxes by the municipality shall be made as required to be made by the state and county collector, and shall be filed with the municipal clerk within twenty days after the tax sale, and shall there remain, subject to redemption for the same length of time and in the same manner as prescribed for the redemption of lands sold for state and county taxes, with the same saving to infants and persons of unsound mind. Said lists shall have the same force and effect, and confer the same right and entitle the purchasers to the same remedies, as lists made for delinquent taxes by the state and county tax collector. Such title shall be subservient, however, to a title acquired under a sale for state and county taxes.

One copy of the list of land so sold shall be filed within thirty days of such sale with the chancery clerk of the county in which said municipality is located, and the chancery clerk shall file and index said list among the land records of his county, as other tax sales are listed. However, the failure of the clerk so to file such list as herein prescribed shall not affect the validity of such tax sale.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, §§ 3022, 3024; 1906, §§ 3425, 3428; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5984, 5988; 1930, §§ 2585, 2589; 1942, §§ 3742-32, 3742-37; Laws, 1934, ch. 201; Laws, 1938, ch. 334; Laws, 1950, ch. 492, §§ 32, 37; Laws, 1966, ch. 602, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 1966).

§ 21-33-65.
Sale of land not sold at appointed time.

If, from any cause, a sale of any land for municipal taxes, both ad valorem and for special improvements, or any installment thereof, that may be delinquent, which is liable to such sale shall not be made at the time appointed by law for such sale, it may be sold thereafter, in the same or a subsequent year, at any time designated therefor by order of the governing authorities of the municipality in which such land may be situated. Notice of a sale so ordered shall be given by advertising it in the manner prescribed by law for the sale of land for state and county taxes, and the sale shall be made at the same place and be subject to all the provisions of law applicable to such sales made at the time appointed by law. Lists of lands sold to the municipality and to individuals shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the municipality within the same relative period of time after the sale as is allowed by law for filing such lists after tax sales made at the regular time, and the clerk shall at once record them. Such lists shall be as valid and have the same effect and be subject to all the provisions of the law applicable to such lists made of lands sold at the regular sale for taxes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3742-33; Laws, 1938, ch. 332; Laws, 1950, ch. 492, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-67.
Recording of conveyances.

A list of the conveyances of land sold for municipal taxes, either to the municipalities or to individuals, shall be recorded in an indexed record, which shall be kept in the office of the mayor or the city clerk of the municipality. All redemptions of said lands shall be noted on said record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3426; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5986; 1930, § 2587; 1942, § 3742-34; Laws, 1950, ch. 492, § 34; Laws, 1995, ch. 447, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 21-33-69.
Lands struck off to the municipality.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 27-41-2, where lands are offered for sale for unpaid municipal taxes or special improvement taxes or municipal separate school district taxes, and a person will not bid therefor the amount of taxes, damages, and costs due, the same shall be struck off to the municipality and otherwise, where applicable, dealt with as lands are which are sold to the state for delinquent state and county taxes. The governing authorities shall be authorized to pay the state and county taxes on lands thus acquired by the municipality, and to collect the money thus paid, with the same damages and interest allowed individuals in similar cases under the general revenue laws of the state thereon from the date of such payment, upon the redemption of the lands from the municipal sale.

Where lands have heretofore been, or may hereafter be struck off to a municipality for unpaid municipal taxes or special improvement taxes or municipal separate school districts taxes, and such lands have also been sold or struck off to an individual or to the state for unpaid state, county, or taxing district taxes, the governing authorities of such municipality are hereby authorized to redeem such lands from the sale for delinquent state, county, or taxing district taxes by paying to the chancery clerk of the county where such lands are situated the amount necessary to redeem same and to collect the money thus paid, together with interest thereon at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum from the date of such payment, upon the redemption of such lands from the municipal sale. Such lands may be redeemed from the municipal sale for unpaid municipal taxes or special improvement taxes by the owner or other person interested in such lands, including the person to whom such lands were struck off or sold at the sale for state, county, or taxing district taxes.

When lands have heretofore or may hereafter be struck off to a municipality for unpaid municipal taxes or special improvement taxes or municipal separate school district taxes, and the title to such lands has matured or may hereafter mature in the state by virtue of a sale for unpaid state, county, or taxing district taxes, the governing authorities of such municipality may purchase said lands from the state at a price to be agreed upon by the Secretary of State, Governor, or other lawful authority. Upon payment of such amounts into the State Treasury, the state’s title to said lands shall be conveyed to the said municipality by a patent, or patents, executed and delivered as provided by law in cases of sales of state lands to individuals.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3023; 1906, § 3427; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5987; 1930, § 2588; 1942, § 3742-35; Laws, 1936, ch. 280; Laws, 1950, ch. 492, § 35; Laws, 1993, ch. 540, § 3, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

§ 21-33-71.
Taxing of lands acquired by municipality.

When the state, county, or taxing district taxes are paid by a municipality, or where lands are redeemed or purchased by a municipality, as provided in Section 21-33-69, such lands shall not be exempt from state, county, or other taxing district taxes but shall be liable for such taxes the same as if owned by an individual. It shall be the duty of the tax assessor to assess lands purchased pursuant to the authority granted in Section 29-1-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, for taxes in the same manner as other lands are assessed and if the taxes are not paid when due, it shall be the duty of the tax collector to sell said land for the delinquent taxes due and unpaid at the time and in the manner provided by law for the sale of lands for delinquent taxes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3742-36, 4087; Laws, 1936, chs. 174, 280; Laws, 1950, ch. 492, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-73.
Municipality may purchase at state and county tax sales.

Any municipality in the state having a tax lien for special improvements or any other tax lien upon property located therein is hereby authorized, when the said property is offered for sale by the state and county for state and county taxes due thereon, to purchase at such tax sale the property upon which it holds said special improvement lien, and shall be authorized to pay the amount of its bid therefor.

Whenever property upon which any municipality in this state holds a lien has already been sold for state and county taxes, the municipality may redeem the tax sale the same as other lien holders in the state, and authority for municipalities to so thus redeem is hereby granted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3742-38; Laws, 1932, ch. 231; Laws, 1950, ch. 492, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-75.
Sale or lease of land by municipality.

After the time to redeem from the municipal tax sale has expired, or after the municipality has purchased land as provided by law, said municipality, acting through its governing authorities, shall take possession of said lands and shall endeavor to sell same as expeditiously as good business may require. However, it may lease said lands until a sale thereof can be made.

Said municipal governing authorities may lease or sell any of said lands to any person in any manner that may be prescribed by an order or resolution, which said order or resolution shall be entered in the minutes covering each particular tract of land so leased or sold, it being the intention of the legislature to vest in municipal authorities in each specific case of lease or sale the right to fix the price, terms, and conditions of each sale or lease.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3025; 1906, § 3429; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5989; 1930, § 2590; 1942, § 3742-39; Laws, 1934, ch. 328; Laws, 1936, ch. 280; Laws, 1950, ch. 492, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-77.
Borrowing on delinquent tax lands.

When any municipality shall buy in property for delinquent taxes, such municipality is hereby authorized to issue notes, bonds, or certificates of indebtedness for the amount of the tax, for a period of time not to exceed one year after the period provided for the redemption of such land and, in addition to pledging the full faith, credit, and resources of the municipality therefor, such municipality may pledge the taxes and damages from delinquent tax sales thereon. When said notes, bonds, or certificates of indebtedness are so issued, all funds collected on said delinquent taxes and damages, or the sale of the property, in the event the title ripens in the municipality, shall be set aside as a special or trust fund for the retirement of said notes, bonds, or certificates of indebtedness. The rate of interest of said notes, bonds, or certificates of indebtedness not to exceed six per centum per annum. The authority implied and granted in this section shall apply also to the boards of trustees in municipal separate school districts, by and with the consent of the governing authorities of such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3742-40; Laws, 1932, ch. 303; Laws, 1950, ch. 492, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-79.
Refund of erroneously paid taxes.

The tax collectors of all municipalities are hereby authorized to refund erroneously-paid privilege or ad valorem taxes paid such municipalities. An applicant for such refunds shall submit application to the tax collector of any such municipality, and if such claim be found by the tax collector to be due, and is allowed, then the tax collector of said municipality shall issue a warrant to the claimant and deduct the proper amounts from his next settlement.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2591; 1942, § 3742-41; Laws, 1926, ch. 273; Laws, 1936, ch. 278; Laws, 1950, ch. 492, § 41; Laws, 1985, ch. 425, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1985).

§ 21-33-81.
Surveys and appraisals authorized.

The governing authorities of any municipality in this state are hereby authorized, in their discretion, to have the lands in the municipality (whether platted in lots and blocks or otherwise described) appraised, surveyed, the area determined, and the land and any buildings, structures or improvements thereon valued for the purpose of assessment and taxation. Such survey and appraisal may be made by the assessor or by a competent person, or persons, to be selected by the governing authorities, and the cost thereof paid from the general fund. When such survey and appraisal are made, a permanent record thereof shall be prepared and preserved as a public record by the clerk. The assessor, any member of the governing authorities, or any state official performing duties with reference to the assessment of property shall have access to such records at all reasonable hours.

The governing authorities may have prepared cards, maps, plats and such other records as may be considered proper and necessary to keep a record of all land and the elements of value thereof, in the municipality, and to revise and correct the same from time to time in order that such appraisal, and the other information, may be current.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3742-30; Laws, 1938, Ex. Sess., ch. 19; Laws, 1950, ch. § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-83.
Appeals.

Any person, firm, or corporation aggrieved by the action of the governing authorities of any municipality under Sections 21-33-1 through 21-33-85 shall have the right of appeal to the circuit court of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3742-43; Laws, 1938, Ex. Sess., ch. 70; Laws, 1950, ch. 492, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 1950; brought forward without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 431, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 21-33-85.
Application of Sections 21-33-1 through 21-33-85.

Sections 21-33-1 through 21-33-85 and Section 27-41-2 shall apply to all municipalities, whether operating under code charter, special charter, or any commission form of government, except as may be otherwise provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3742-25, 3742-44; Laws, 1936, ch. 280; Laws, 1950, ch. 492, §§ 25, 44; Laws, 1993, ch. 540, § 4, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

§ 21-33-87.
Tax levy to pay bonds and coupons.

The municipal governing authorities shall have the power to levy and collect annually taxes on all the taxable property within the municipal limits, in addition to other taxes, in a sufficient amount, for the purpose of paying the interest coupons as they become due on all bonds of the municipality now issued or hereafter to be issued, and the bonds themselves, which tax shall be payable only in cash or in matured coupons or bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2927; 1906, § 3318; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5815; 1930, § 2395; 1942, § 3374-115; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 115, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-89.
Tax levy for street and cemetery purposes in certain municipalities.

The governing authorities of any municipality having a population of less than one thousand, according to the last federal census, shall have the power and authority, in their discretion, to assess, levy and collect an additional ad valorem tax on all of the taxable property in such municipality of not exceeding two mills on the dollar for street maintenance, upkeep and construction purposes, and/or an additional ad valorem tax on all of the taxable property in such municipality of not exceeding two mills on the dollar for cemetery improvement, upkeep and maintenance purposes, which said taxes shall be in addition to all other taxes now authorized by law. However, such taxes shall not be levied unless and until the levy thereof has been approved by a majority of the qualified voters of such municipality voting in an election to be held for such purpose, notice of which election shall be given in some newspaper having a general circulation in such municipality not less than twenty nor more than thirty days prior to such election; one publication of such notice shall be sufficient. No consideration for homestead exemption refunds shall be considered in connection with the assessment and levy provided herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-166; Laws, 1946, ch. 439; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 166, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-91.
Exemption from municipal ad valorem taxes of certain property constructed, renovated, or improved in central business district.

The governing authorities of any municipality having a population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000) according to the most recent federal census and in which the qualified electors have approved at a special election participation in redevelopment projects in its central business district pursuant to Sections 43-35-201 through 43-35-235 may, in their discretion, exempt from all municipal ad valorem taxes, for a period of not more than seven (7) years from and after January 1, 1974, any privately owned new structures and any new renovations of and improvements to existing structures lying within a slum or blighted area within the central business district, as determined by the municipality, but only if such structures shall have been constructed, renovated or improved pursuant with the requirements of the approved project of the municipality for redevelopment of slum or blighted areas within its central business district. Such exemption shall be granted upon written application only after the finding by the governing authorities of a municipality that the construction, renovation or improvement of said property is for the purpose of promoting business and commerce in the central business district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 425, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1974).